New Jersey, session 221, A2759.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Beginning with the 2018-2019 grade nine class, the State Board of Education shall require that the high school graduation requirement on financial literacy includes instruction on available State and federal tuition assistance programs, including grants, scholarships, and student loans.  The instruction shall incorporate issues associated with student loan debt, the requirements for repayment of that debt, and the consequences of the failure to repay student loan debt in a timely manner. 2.    A school district shall ensure that a student enrolled in high school meets with a guidance counselor during either the second or third year of high school to discuss State and federal tuition assistance programs, including grants, scholarships, and student loans, that may be available to the student to finance postsecondary educational opportunities.  The guidance counselor shall also discuss the options available to the student for dual enrollment in the high school and an institution of higher education that will enable the student to earn college credit while still in high school and reduce the overall cost of a higher education. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.